Hawaii statutes.
§414-438 Change of registered agent of foreign
corporation. (a) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in
this State may change its registered agent by complying with the requirements
of section 425R-7.

(b) If a registered agent changes its name,
its address, or its type or jurisdiction of organization, the agent shall
comply with the requirements of section 425R-8 or 425R-9, whichever is
applicable. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §31; am L 2009, c 55,
§14]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next